Hawaii, session 2026, SB2609.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 291C-72, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a)  The driver of a vehicle shall stop for a pedestrian who is crossing the roadway within a crosswalk [when the pedestrian is either: (1)  Upon the half of the roadway upon which the vehicle is traveling; or (2)  Approaching the vehicle so closely from the opposite half of the roadway as to be in danger,] and shall not proceed until the pedestrian has [passed the vehicle and the driver can safely proceed.] completely crossed the roadway." SECTION 2.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________